tr: Telefon kayışı aksesuarları dahildir: Adaptör kartı; Karabina klipsi; Çıkarılabilir charm; Çıkarılabilir bileklik; Anahtarlık; Telefon kartı yuvası; Telefon kılıfı; Kese; Yedek Velcro yama; Dayanıklı çanta; Diğer
cs: Přiložené příslušenství popruhu na telefon: Redukční jazýček; Karabinový klip; Odnímatelný přívěsek; Odnímatelný náramek; Kroužek na klíče; Vkládací karta; Pouzdro na telefon; Kapsa; Náhradní suchý zip; Taštička; Jiné
it: Accessori per cinturino per telefono inclusi: Scheda adattatore; Moschettone; Ciondolo staccabile; Cinturino staccabile; Portachiavi; Inserimento della scheda telefonica; Custodia per telefono; Borsa; Toppa in velcro di ricambio; Borsa portaoggetti; Altro
ja: 電話ストラップ付属アクセサリ: アダプタータブ; カラビナクリップ; 取り外し可能なチャーム; 取取り外し可能なリストレット; キーホルダー; テレホンカード挿入; テレホンカード; ポーチ; 交換用ベルクロパッチ; ユーティリティバッグ; その他
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeinantys telefono dirželio priedai: Adapterio blokas; Karabinas; Nuimamas pakabukas; Nuimama apyrankė; Raktų pakabukas; Telefono kortelės įdėklas; Telefono dėklas; Maišelis; Keičiamas krepšelis su lipduku; Krepšys smulkmenoms; Kita
nb: Tilbehør til telefonstropp inkludert: Adaptertype; Karabinklips; Avtakbart anheng; Avtakbart armbånd; Nøkkelring; Telefonkortinnsats; Telefondeksel; Pose; Erstatning for borrelåslapp; Verktøyveske; Annet
ko: 휴대폰 스트랩 액세서리 포함: 어댑터 탭; 카라비너 클립; 분리 가능한 참; 탈부착 가능한 손목 가방; 열쇠고리; 전화카드 삽입; 휴대폰 케이스; 파우치; 교체용 벨크로 패치; 유틸리티 백; 기타
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมสายคล้องโทรศัพท์รวมอยู่ด้วย: แท็บอะแดปเตอร์; คลิปคาราบิเนอร์; เสน่ห์ที่ถอดออกได้; สายคล้องข้อมือแบบถอดได้; พวงกุญแจ; การ์ดโทรศัพท์แบบสอด; เคสโทรศัพท์; ซอง; แผ่น Velcro สำหรับเปลี่ยน; กระเป๋าอเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 隨附的手機吊飾配件: 轉接器插片; 登山扣環; 可拆式吊飾; 可拆式腕帶; 鑰匙圈; 插卡式手機設計; 手機殼; 收納袋; 替換型魔鬼氈貼片; 萬用袋; 其他
hr-HR: Uključeni dodaci vezice za telefon: Kartica adaptera; Karabiner; Odvojivi privjesak; Odvojiva narukvica; Privjesak za ključeve; Umetak za telefonsku karticu; Futrola za telefon; Ambalažna vrećica; Zamjenska čičak-traka; Praktična torba; Ostalo
nl: Telefoonriemaccessoires inbegrepen: Adaptertab; Karabijnclip; Afneembare bedel; Afneembare polsband; Sleutelhanger; Telefoonkaartinzetstuk; Telefoonhoesje; Zakje; Vervangende klittenbandpatch; Gebruikstas; Andere
pt-BR: Acessórios de alça para celular incluídos: Aba de adaptador; Mosquetão; Pingente destacável; Pulseira destacável; Chaveiro; Encarte de cartão telefônico; Capa telefônica; Estojo; Remendo de velcro de substituição; Bolsa utilitária; Outro
sk-SK: Príslušenstvo k popruhu na telefón: Adaptér na popruh; Karabínová spona; Odnímateľný prívesok; Odnímateľné pútko na zápästie; Prívesok na kľúče; Vložka telefónnej karty; Puzdro na telefón; Vrecúško; Náhradná suchá zipsová nášivka; Úžitková taška; Iné
ru: Принадлежности для телефонного ремешка в комплекте: Адаптер; Карабин; Съемная подвеска; Съемный ремешок на запястье; Кольцо для ключей; Карта-вкладыш для чехла; Чехол для телефона; Мешочек; Сменная застежка-липучка; Универсальная сумочка; Другое
pl: Akcesoria do paska na telefon w zestawie: Karta adaptera; Karabińczyk; Odczepiana zawieszka; Odpinany pasek na nadgarstek; Brelok; Wkładka na kartę do telefonu; Etui na telefon; Futerał; Wymienna kieszonka na rzep; Torba użytkowa; Inne
fr: Accessoires de sangle de téléphone inclus: Onglet Adaptateur; Mousqueton; Breloque détachable; Bracelet détachable; Porte-clés; Insertion de carte téléphonique; Étui de téléphone; Pochette; Patch Velcro de remplacement; Sac utilitaire; Autre
ro-RO: Accesorii de tip curea pentru telefon incluse: Suport adaptor; Clemă carabină; Talisman detașabil; Brățară detașabilă; Breloc; Introducerea cartelei telefonice; Carcasă de telefon; Săculeț; Bandă Velcro de schimb; Geantă utilitară; Altele
sv: Tillbehör för objektivkit ingår: Adapterflik; Karbinhakeklämma; Löstagbar berlock; Avtagbar handledsrem; Nyckelring; Telefonkortinsats; Telefonfodral; Påse; Ersättningslapp med kardborreband; Verktygsväska; Övrigt
bg-BG: Включени са аксесоари за каишка за телефон: Разделител за адаптер; Щипка за карабинер; Свалящ се късмет; Сваляща се гривна; Ключодържател; Вложка за телефонна карта; Калъф за телефон; Чантичка; Резервна велкро лепенка; Помощна чанта; Други
zh-CN: 手机挂绳附带配件: 固定片; 登山扣; 可拆卸吊饰; 可拆卸腕带; 钥匙圈; 手机卡插片; 手机壳; 收纳袋; 替换魔术贴; 工具包; 其他
vi: Phụ kiện đi kèm dây đeo điện thoại: Miếng dán gắn dây đeo; Móc khóa đa năng; Phụ kiện trang trí có thể tháo rời; Dây đeo cổ tay có thể tháo rời; Khoen chìa khóa; Tấm đựng thẻ điện thoại; Ốp điện thoại; Ví cầm tay; Miếng dán Velcro thay thế; Túi đựng đồ; Khác
de: Im Lieferumfang enthaltener Telefonriemen: Adapterlasche; Karabinerclip; Abnehmbarer Anhänger; Abnehmbares Armband; Schlüsselanhänger; Telefonkarteneinlage; Telefonhülle; Beutel; Ersatz-Klettverschluss; Gebrauchstasche; Sonstiges
hu: Telefonszíj-tartozékok: Adapter fül; Karabineres csíptető; Levehető charm; Levehető csuklópánt; Keyring; Kártyatartó betét; Telefontok; Tasak; Tartalék tépőzáras tapasz; Tartozéktáska; Egyéb
pt-PT: Acessórios para cordão de telefone incluídos: Aba de adaptador; Mosquetão; Pingente removível; Pulseira removível; Porta-chaves; Inserção de cartão telefónico; Capa de telefone; Bolsa; Remendo de velcro de substituição; Bolsa utilitária; Outro
el: Περιλαμβάνονται αξεσουάρ για λουράκι τηλεφώνου: Θηλιά προσαρμογέα; Κλιπ καραμπίνερ; Αποσπώμενο γούρι; Αποσπώμενο βραχιόλι; Μπρελόκ; Θέση εισαγωγής κάρτας τηλεφώνου; Θήκη τηλεφώνου; Πουγκί; Ανταλλακτική ταινία Velcro; Σάκος γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
fi: Puhelimen nauhan lisävarusteet: Sovitinläppä; Karabiini; Irrotettava riipus; Irrotettava rannehihna; Avaimenperä; Puhelinkortin lokero; Puhelinkotelo; Pussi; Vaihtotarranauha; Varustepussi; Muu
en: Phone strap accessories included: Adapter tab; Carabiner clip; Detachable charm; Detachable wristlet; Keyring; Phone card insert; Phone case; Pouch; Replacement Velcro patch; Utility bag; Other
sl-SI: Priloženi dodatki za pašček telefona: Adapter zavihek; Karabin sponka; Odstranljiv obesek; Odstranljiv pašček za zapestje; Obroček za ključe; Vložek za telefonsko kartico; Ovitek za telefon; Torbica; Nadomestni ježek; Večnamenska torbica; Drugo
da: Tilbehør til telefonrem medfølger: Adapterstykke; Karabinhageklips; Aftageligt vedhæng; Aftageligt armbånd; Nøglering; Telefonkortholder; Telefonæske; Pose; Ekstra velcrolap; Værktøjstaske; Andet
es: Accesorios de correa de teléfono incluidos: Pestaña del adaptador; Clip de mosquetón; Dije desmontable; Pulsera desmontable; Llavero; Inserción de tarjeta telefónica; Funda de teléfono; Bolsa; Parche de velcro de repuesto; Bolsa de herramientas; Otros